Arkansas, session 2025, HB1526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-60-105. Public-private partnerships and other forms of support —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "public-private partnership" means an
agreement between the Department of the Military and a private entity.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of the Military, subject to
promulgated rules, may:
(1)(A) Enter into a public-private partnership to facilitate the
activities of the Department of the Military or the Arkansas National Guard
for recruiting and retention.
(B) A public-private partnership under this section is
subject to the requirements and limitations of this section and all other
*ZRC017*
03-18-2025 10:28:47 ZRC017

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/18/25 HB1526
laws, procedures, and rules to which the Department of the Military or the
Arkansas National Guard are subject;
(2) Accept voluntary services from a private entity to
facilitate recruiting and retention; and
(3) Accept, hold, administer, and use personal property or
services from a private entity for the purpose of facilitating recruiting and
retention.
(c) The Secretary of the Department of the Military shall:
(1) Not accept or use personal property or voluntary services
from a private entity if the acceptance or use of personal property or
voluntary services would compromise the integrity or the appearance of
integrity of:
(A) A program of the Department of the Military;
(B) A program of the Arkansas National Guard; or
(C) An individual involved with a program of the
Department of the Military or the Arkansas National Guard; and
(2) Promulgate rules to implement this section, including without
limitation rules regarding the establishment and implementation of a public-
private partnership.
(d)(1) Personal property accepted under this section may be used by
the Department of the Military.
(2) Services accepted under this section may be performed
without further specific authorization in law.
(e) An agreement for a public-private partnership under this section
shall be presented to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is
in session, to the Joint Budget Committee, for:
(1) Reporting if the total value of the personnel services or
property received by the Department of the Military or the Arkansas National
Guard under the agreement is more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but
less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in one (1) year or the total
projected value of the personnel services and property, including any
amendments or possible extensions, is under three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000); and
(2) Review if the total value of the personnel services and
property received by the Department of the Military or the Arkansas National
Guard under the agreement is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more in one
03-18-2025 10:28:47 ZRC017

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/18/25 HB1526
(1) year or the total projected value of the personnel services and property,
including any amendments or possible extensions, is at least three hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($350,000).
/s/Painter
































03-18-2025 10:28:47 ZRC017